Utah statutes.
58-78-501.   Unlawful conduct.
In addition to the definition in Section 58-1-501, "unlawful conduct" includes
using the title "vocational rehabilitation counselor" or any other title or
designation tending to indicate that the individual is a vocational
rehabilitation counselor unless the individual has a current license as a
vocational rehabilitation counselor issued under this chapter.
